ru: Тип отвала бульдозера: Угловой; Полукруглый; Прямой (S-образный); Универсальный (U-образный); Другой
sl-SI: Vrsta odrivne deske buldožerja: Kotni; Polovični plug U; Ravno (S-rezilo); Univerzalno (U-rezilo); Druga
it: Tipo di lama dozer: Angolo; Semi-U; Dritto (lama a S); Universale (lama a U); Altro
hr-HR: Tip noža buldožera: Kut; Polu-U; Ravna (S-žlica); Univerzalna (U-žlica); Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип острие за булдозер: Ъгъл; Полу-U; Прав (S-острие); Универсален (U-острие); Други
pt-PT: Tipo de pá da escavadora: Angular; Semi-U; Reta (lâmina S); Universal (lâmina em U); Outro
sv: Bulldozerbladtyp: Vinkel; Semi-U; Rak (S-blad); Universell (U-blad); Övrigt
ja: ブルドーザーブレードタイプ: アングル; セミU; ストレート (Sブレード); ユニバーサル (Uブレード); その他
zh-TW: 推土機鏟刀類型: 角度; 半 U 型; 直式 (S 型刀片); 通用 (U 型刀片); 其他
el: Τύπος λεπίδας μπουλντόζας: Γωνιακή; Ημι-U; Ευθεία (λεπίδα S); Γενικής χρήσης (λεπίδα U); Άλλο
es: Tipo de hoja de topadora: Ángulo; Semi-U; Recto (hoja en S); Universal (hoja en U); Otros
pl: Typ lemiesza spycharki: Kąt; Pół U; Proste (ostrze S); Uniwersalne (ostrze U); Inne
nb: Bulldoserbladtype: Vinkel; Semi-U; Rett (S-blad); Universal (U-blad); Annet
de: Planierschildtyp: Schrägschnitt; Semi-U; Gerade (S-Schild); Universal (U-Schild); Sonstiges
da: Bulldozer bladtype: Vinkel; Semi-U; Lige (S-blad); Universal (U-blad); Andet
hu: Bulldózerlapát típusa: Szögletes; Hajlított; Egyenes (S alakú lapát); Univerzális (U alakú lapát); Egyéb
lt-LT: Buldozerio ašmenų tipas: Lenkti; „Semi-U“; Tiesūs (S formos); Universalūs (U formos); Kita
vi: Loại lưỡi máy ủi: Đầu vát; Bán cấu trúc; Thẳng (lưỡi chữ S); Đa năng (lưỡi chữ U); Khác
sk-SK: Typ lyžice buldozéra: Uhol; Semi-U; Rovný (S-čepeľ); Univerzálny (U-čepeľ); Iné
cs: Typ radlice buldozeru: Úhlový; Poloviční U; Rovná (S-čepel); Univerzální (U-čepel); Jiné
zh-CN: 推土机铲刀类型: 角度; 半 U 型; 直型（S 型刀片）; 通用（U 型刀片）; 其他
ro-RO: Tip lamă de buldozer: Unghiulară; Semi-U; Dreaptă (lamă în S); Universală (lamă în U); Altele
pt-BR: Tipo de lâmina de escavadeira: Ângulo; Semi-U; Reta (S-blade); Universal (U-blade); Outro
en: Bulldozer blade type: Angle; Semi-U; Straight (S-blade); Universal (U-blade); Other
th: ประเภทใบมีดรถดันดิน: หน้าตัดเฉียง; แบบครึ่งตัว U; แบบตรง (ใบมีดรูปตัว S); สากล (ใบมีดรูปตัว U); อื่นๆ
fi: Puskutraktorin terätyyppi: Kulma; Puoli-U; Suora (S-terä); Universaali (U-terä); Muu
nl: Type bulldozerblad: Hoek; Semi-U; Recht (S-mes); Universeel (U-mes); Andere
ko: 불도저 블레이드 유형: 각도; 세미U; 일자형(S블레이드); 범용(U블레이드); 기타
tr: Buldozer Bıçak Tipi: Açı; Yarı U; Düz (S bıçaklı); Evrensel (U bıçaklı); Diğer
fr: Type de pelle bulldozer: En angle; Semi-U; Droit (lame en S); Universel (lame en U); Autre